Florida, session 2026, HB4059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) As used in this act, the term:
(a) "Air ambulance" means a fixed-wing or rotary-wing
aircraft used for, or intended to be used for, air
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
require medical attention during transport.
(b) "Emergency medical services vehicle" means a privately
or publicly owned vehicle or vessel that is designed,
constructed, reconstructed, maintained, equipped, or operated
for, and is used for, or intended to be used for, land or water
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4059 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4059 2026 Legislature
require medical attention during transport.
(c) "Emergency medical transportation services" includes,
but is not limited to, services rendered by means of an
emergency medical services vehicle or air ambulance.
(d) "Health care provider" means:
1. A hospital licensed under chapter 395, Florida
Statutes.
2. A physician or physician assistant licensed under
chapter 458, Florida Statutes.
3. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant
licensed under chapter 459, Florida Statutes.
4. A podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461,
Florida Statutes.
5. A health maintenance organization certificated under
part I of chapter 641, Florida Statutes.
6. An ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter
395, Florida Statutes.
7. A facility the primary purpose of which is to provide
human medical diagnostic services or a facility providing
nonsurgical human medical treatment, to which facility the
patient is admitted and from which facility the patient is
discharged within the same working day, and which facility is
not part of a hospital. However, the term does not include a
facility existing for the primary purpose of performing
terminations of pregnancy or an office maintained by a physician
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4059 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4059 2026 Legislature
or dentist for the practice of medicine.
8. A professional association, partnership, corporation,
joint venture, or other association composed of the persons
listed in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. for professional
activity.
(2)(a) Except as specifically provided in this subsection,
compensation to a health care provider to provide any medical
services for an inmate housed in a Polk County detention center
may not exceed 110 percent of the Medicare allowable rate if the
health care provider does not have a contract with Polk County
to provide inmate medical services.
(b) Compensation to a health care provider may not exceed
125 percent of the Medicare allowable rate if:
1. The health care provider does not have a contract with
Polk County to provide inmate medical services; and
2. The health care provider reported a negative operating
margin for the previous year to the Agency for Health Care
Administration through hospital-audited financial data.
(3) Compensation to an entity to provide emergency medical
transportation services for an inmate housed in a Polk County
detention center may not exceed 110 percent of the Medicare
allowable rate if the entity does not have a contract with Polk
County to provide inmate emergency medical transportation
services.
(4) This act does not apply to charges for medical
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4059 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4059 2026 Legislature
services provided at a hospital operated by Polk County.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4059 -00-er